Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2011
54-1916
Director of Agriculture; state program
of meat and poultry inspection; report; contents.

On or before November 15, 2011, the Director
of Agriculture shall provide a report to the Legislature which enumerates
and describes any actions necessary to implement a state program of meat and
poultry inspection at establishments which process meat, poultry, or meat
and poultry products for human consumption that qualifies as a cooperative
state inspection program under the Federal Meat Inspection Act, 21 U.S.C.
661, and the Poultry Products Inspection Act, 21 U.S.C. 454. The report shall
identify necessary revisions of the Nebraska Meat and Poultry Inspection Law,
other revisions to statutory authority of the Department of Agriculture, and
any rules and regulations promulgated thereto in order to effect the purposes
of this section. The report shall include a detailed description of anticipated
resources required to develop and maintain such program of meat and poultry
inspection. The report shall recommend a fee schedule that ensures revenue
produced from the licensure and inspection of establishments which process
meat, poultry, or meat and poultry products for human consumption sufficient
to fund the state program of meat and poultry inspection, including the implementation
of a fee-for-service system in conducting inspections.

Laws 2011, LB305, § 2.

Nebraska Meat and Poultry Inspection Law, see section 54-1901.